Utah statutes.
58-56-4.   Definitions -- Adoption of building codes -- Amendments --
Approval of other codes -- Exemptions.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "agricultural use" means a use that relates to the tilling of soil and
raising of crops, or keeping or raising domestic animals;
(b)  "not for human occupancy" means use of a structure for purposes other
than protection or comfort of human beings, but allows people to enter the
structure for:
(i)  maintenance and repair; and
(ii)  the care of livestock, crops, or equipment intended for agricultural use
which are kept there; and
(c)  "residential area" means land that is not used for an agricultural use
and is:
(i) (A)  within the boundaries of a city or town; and
(B)  less than five contiguous acres;
(ii) (A)  within a subdivision for which the county has approved a subdivision
plat under Title 17, Chapter 27a, Part 6, Subdivisions; and
(B)  less than two contiguous acres; or
(iii)  not located in whole or in part in an agricultural protection area
created under Title 17, Chapter 41, Agriculture and Industrial Protection
Areas.
(2)  A person shall follow an adopted code when:
(a)  new construction is involved; and
(b)  the owner of an existing building, or the owner's agent, is voluntarily
engaged in:
(i)  the repair, renovation, remodeling, alteration, enlargement,
rehabilitation, conservation, or reconstruction of the building; or
(ii)  changing the character or use of the building in a manner which
increases the occupancy loads, other demands, or safety risks of the building.
(3) (a)  Beginning May 12, 2009, the board and commission shall, in accordance
with Sections 53-7-204 and 58-56-5, make recommendations to the Business and
Labor Interim Committee as to whether or not the Legislature should take
legislative action.
(b) (i)  If the Business and Labor Interim Committee decides to recommend
legislative action to the Legislature, the Business and Labor Interim
Committee shall prepare legislation for consideration by the Legislature in
the next general session.
(ii)  The legislation described in Subsection (3)(b)(i) shall direct:
(A)  the division to administer an adopted code, excluding the fire code, in
accordance with legislative action approved by the Legislature; and
(B)  the board to administer an adopted fire code in accordance with
legislative action approved by the Legislature.
(4) (a)  Notwithstanding Subsection (3), the commission may, in accordance
with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, adopt an
adopted code, except the fire code, if the commission determines that waiting
for legislative action in the next general legislative session under
Subsection (3) would:
(i)  cause an imminent peril to the public health, safety, or welfare; or
(ii)  place a person in violation of federal or other state law.
(b)  If the commission adopts an adopted code under Subsection (4)(a), the
commission shall file with the division:
(i)  the text of the adopted code; and
(ii)  an analysis that includes the specific reasons and justifications for
its findings.
(c)  The division shall, in accordance with Subsection (4)(b):
(i)  publish the adopted code in accordance with Section 58-56-6; and
(ii)  notify the Business and Labor Interim Committee of the adoption,
including a copy of the commission's analysis described in Subsection (5)(b).
(d)  If not formally adopted by the Legislature at its next annual general
session, an adopted code adopted under this Subsection (4) is repealed
effective at midnight on the last day that the Legislature adjourns sine die
at its next annual general session.
(5) (a)  Notwithstanding Subsection (3), the board may, in accordance with
Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, adopt a fire code,
if the board determines that waiting for legislative action in the next
general legislative session under Subsection (3) would:
(i)  cause an imminent peril to the public health, safety, or welfare; or
(ii)  place a person in violation of federal or other state law.
(b)  The board shall:
(i)  publish the adopted fire code; and
(ii)  notify the Business and Labor Interim Committee of the adoption,
including a copy of an analysis by the board identifying specific reasons and
justifications for its findings.
(c)  If not formally adopted by the Legislature at its next annual general
session, a fire code adopted under this Subsection (5) is repealed effective
at midnight on the last day that the Legislature adjourns sine die at its next
annual general session.
(6) (a)  The division, in consultation with the commission, has discretion to
approve, without adopting, certain approved codes, including specific editions
of the approved codes, for use by a compliance agency.
(b)  Under Subsection (6)(a), a compliance agency has the discretion to:
(i)  adopt an ordinance requiring removal, demolition, or repair of a
building, according to an adopted code;
(ii)  adopt, by ordinance or rule, a dangerous building code; or
(iii)  adopt, by ordinance or rule, a building rehabilitation code.
(7) (a)  Except in a residential area, a structure used solely in conjunction
with agriculture use, and not for human occupancy, is exempted from the permit
requirements of an adopted code.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (7)(a), unless otherwise exempted, plumbing,
electrical, and mechanical permits may be required when that work is included
in the structure.
